Idaho, session 2026, S1358.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1004B. CAREER LADDER. School districts shall receive an allocation
for instructional staff and pupil service staff based on their staffs' posi-
tion on the career ladder as follows:
(1) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who are in their first
year of holding an Idaho certificate shall be placed in the first cell of the
residency compensation rung and shall move one (1) cell on the residency com-
pensation rung for each year they hold an Idaho certificate and are employed
in an Idaho public school thereafter for up to three (3) years, at which point
they will remain in the third cell of the residency rung until they earn a
professional endorsement.
(2) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding a professional endorsement shall be placed in the first cell of the
professional compensation rung.
(3) Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the professional
compensation rung with four (4) years of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to meet the
professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the
previous four (4) years. Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the
professional compensation rung who meet the performance criteria for three
(3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must be during the fourth
or fifth year, shall move one (1) cell. Allocations for instructional staff
and pupil service staff who do not meet the professional compensation rung
performance criteria for three (3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of
which must be during the fourth or fifth year, shall remain at the previous
fiscal year allocation level. This also applies to the educational alloca-
tion.
(4) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding an advanced professional endorsement shall be placed in the first
cell of the advanced professional compensation rung.
(5) Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the advanced profes-
sional compensation rung who met the performance criteria for the advanced
professional rung in the previous year shall move one (1) cell on the ad-
vanced professional compensation rung. Allocations for instructional staff
and pupil service staff who do not meet the advanced professional compensa-


tion rung performance criteria shall remain at the previous fiscal year al-
location level. This also applies to the additional education allocation.
(6) Career technical education instructional staff holding an occupa-
tional specialist certificate shall be placed on the career ladder as fol-
lows:
(a) Instructional staff new to working in an Idaho public school:
(i) With two (2) or three (3) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for one (1)
year;
(ii) With four (4) or five (5) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for two (2)
years;
(iii) With six (6) or seven (7) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for three
(3) years; and
(iv) With eight (8) or more years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for four (4)
years; and
(b) Existing career technical education instructional staff on the
residency compensation rung shall have their placement updated con-
sistent with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection if the
update would result in a rung higher than their current placement.
(7) Instructional staff or pupil service staff entering their first
year on the career ladder, but with prior certificated instructional, pupil
service, administrative, or equivalent elementary or secondary school ex-
perience, including in an accredited private or parochial school, shall be
placed on the career ladder as follows:
(a) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded a
professional endorsement shall be placed as follows:
(i) Those with four (4) years of certificated experience and doc-
umentation from the hiring school district or charter school ad-
ministrator, attesting the individual has provided evidence that
the individual has met the professional compensation rung perfor-
mance criteria in two (2) of the previous four (4) years, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
four (4) years; or
(ii) Those with five (5) or more years of certificated experi-
ence and documentation from the hiring school district or charter
school administrator, attesting the individual has provided ev-
idence that the individual has met the professional compensation
rung performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5)


years, with one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
the equivalent number of years as they have verified experience.
(b) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded
an advanced professional endorsement with nine (9) or more years of cer-
tificated experience and documentation from the hiring school district
or charter school administrator, attesting the individual has provided
evidence that the individual has met the professional compensation rung
performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5) years, with
one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be placed in an equiv-
alent cell on the career ladder to instructional staff or pupil service
staff who have met the movement criteria for the equivalent number of
years as they have verified experience.
(8) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable
cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional al-
location amount for career technical education instructional staff holding
an occupational specialist certificate in the area for which they are teach-
ing in the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000), which shall be des-
ignated for career technical education staff and included as part of their
salary.
(9) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable
cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional
allocation amount for instructional staff and pupil service staff holding
a professional or an advanced professional endorsement who have acquired
additional education and meet the professional or advanced professional
compensation rung performance criteria. In determining the additional ed-
ucation allocation amount, only transcripted credits and degrees on file
with the teacher certification office of the state department of education,
earned at an institution of higher education accredited by a body recognized
by the state board of education or credits earned through an internship or
work experience approved by the state board of education, shall be allowed.
All credits and degrees earned must be in a relevant pedagogy or content area
as determined by the state department of education. Additional education
allocation amounts are not cumulative. Instructional staff whose initial
certificate is an occupational specialist certificate shall be treated as BA
degree-prepared instructional staff. Credits earned by such occupational
specialist instructional staff after initial certification shall be cred-
ited toward the education allocation. Additional education allocations
are:
(a) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement, a baccalaureate degree
and twenty-four (24) or more credits, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
fiscal year.
(b) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement and a master's degree,
three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per fiscal year.
(c) Effective July 1, 2021, the allocation shall be:


Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,369 $40,990 $41,611
Professional $42,991 $44,836 $46,681 $48,526 $50,370
Advanced
Professional $52,734 $53,207
(d) Effective July 1, 2022, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,742 $41,486 $42,231
Professional $43,488 $45,302 $47,116 $48,930 $50,743
Advanced
Professional $53,478 $54,442 $55,389
(e) Effective July 1, 2023, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,118 $41,988 $42,860
Professional $43,990 $45,773 $47,555 $49,337 $51,119
Advanced
Professional $54,233 $55,705 $57,165 $58,613
(f) Effective July 1, 2024, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,500 $42,500 $43,500
Professional $44,500 $46,250 $48,000 $49,750 $51,500
Advanced
Professional $55,000 $57,000 $59,000 $61,000 $63,000
(10) Effective July 1, 2025, the educator salary-based apportionment
program compensation rung cell amounts shall be adjusted by an amount equiv-
alent to the salary-based apportionment adjustment for administrative and
classified staff positions.
(11) A review of a sample of evaluations completed by administrators
shall be conducted annually to verify such evaluations are being conducted
with fidelity to the state framework for teaching evaluation, including
each domain and identification of which domain or domains the administrator
is focusing on for the instructional staff or pupil service staff member
being evaluated, as outlined in administrative rule. The review shall be
completed prior to November 1 of each year. The state board of education
shall randomly select a sample of administrators throughout the state. A


portion of such administrators' instructional staff and pupil service staff
employee evaluations shall be independently reviewed. The ratio of in-
structional staff evaluations to pupil service staff evaluations shall be
equal to the ratio of the statewide instructional staff salary allowance to
pupil service staff salary allowance. The state board of education, with
input from the Idaho-approved teacher preparation programs and the state
department of education, shall identify individuals and a process to conduct
the reviews. Administrator certificate holders shall be required to par-
ticipate in ongoing evaluation training pursuant to section 33-1204, Idaho
Code. The state board of education shall report annually the findings of
such reviews to the senate education committee, the house of representatives
education committee, the state board of education and the deans of Idaho's
approved teacher preparation programs. The state board of education shall
promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(12) School districts shall submit annually to the state the data nec-
essary to determine if an instructional staff or pupil service staff member
has met the performance criteria for movement on the applicable compensation
rung. Such data shall include the individuals' performance on each of the
performance criteria as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, including
the percentage of students meeting their measurable student achievement and
student success indicator targets. The department of education shall calcu-
late whether or not instructional staff and pupil service staff have met the
compensation rung performance criteria based on the data submitted during
the previous five (5) years. Individually identifiable performance evalu-
ation ratings submitted to the state remain part of the employee's person-
nel record and are exempt from public disclosure pursuant to section 74-106,
Idaho Code.
(13) Superintendents and building-level administrators entering their
first year on the career ladder, but who have prior certificated instruc-
tional, pupil service, administrative, superintendent, or equivalent ele-
mentary or secondary school experience, including experience in an accred-
ited private or parochial school, and whose hiring school district or pub-
lic charter school administrator attests that the individual has provided
evidence of meeting the performance metrics of cumulatively proficient or
higher in their administrative or superintendent evaluation for three (3) of
the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which shall be during the fourth or
fifth year, shall be placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff or
pupil service staff on the career ladder.
(14) Superintendents and building-level administrators with prior
placement on the career ladder as instructional staff or pupil service
staff shall return to an instructional staff or pupil service staff place-
ment while counting years of experience in a superintendent or building
administrator role toward advancement on the career ladder, provided that
the individual has provided evidence of meeting the performance metrics of
cumulatively proficient or higher in the individual's administrative or
superintendent evaluation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to July 1, 2021.